Massachusetts, session 194th, H2931.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 91b of chapter 32 of the General 
Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, for calendar year 2023, the amount of 
excess earnings attributed to Michael Sacco, former Chief Executive Officer of the Worcester 
Regional Retirement Board, shall not exceed the total amount paid to him by the Worcester 
Regional Retirement System in that calendar year, specifically $4,862.84. 
Section 2. This act shall apply only to Michael Sacco and solely with respect to earnings 
accrued and retirement payments received during calendar year 2023. 
Section 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.